Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5556.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30311b. (1) A permit issued under this part shall is not be valid for more than 5 years. (2) The department may establish a reasonable time when the construction, development, or use authorized under any permit issued under this part is to must be completed or terminated. (3) The department may impose on any a permit or authorization under a general permit under this part conditions designed to do any of the following: (a) Remove or reduce an impairment to wetland benefits, as set forth in section 30302, that would otherwise result from the project. (b) Improve the water quality that would otherwise result from the project. (c) Remove or reduce the effect of a discharge of fill material. (4) Any condition imposed on a permit or authorization under a general permit under subsection (3) that is intended to mitigate impacts on wetlands must comply with section 30311e. (5) (4) The department may impose a condition on an authorization under a general permit under subsection (3) only after consultation with the applicant or applicant's agent. Sec. 30311d. (1) The department may impose as a condition on any a permit, other than a general permit, under this part a requirement for compensatory wetland mitigation. The department may approve 1 or more of the following methods of compensatory wetland mitigation: (a) The acquisition of approved credits from a wetland mitigation bank. The department shall not require a permit applicant to provide compensatory wetland mitigation under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) if the applicant prefers and qualifies to use approved credits from the wetland mitigation bank to provide required compensatory wetland mitigation under this subdivision. (b) The restoration of previously existing wetland. The restoration of previously existing wetland is preferred over the creation of new wetland where none previously existed. (c) The creation of new wetlands, if the permit applicant demonstrates that ecological conditions necessary for establishment of a self-sustaining wetland ecosystem exist or will be created. (d) The preservation of exceptional wetlands. (2) If compensatory wetland mitigation under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) is required, a permit applicant shall submit a mitigation plan to the department for approval. In approving a compensatory mitigation plan, the The department shall consider how the location and type of wetland mitigation supports the sustainability or improvement of aquatic resources in the watershed where the activity is permitted when approving a compensatory mitigation plan. The permit applicant shall provide for permanent protection of the wetland mitigation site. The department may accept a conservation easement to protect wetland mitigation and associated upland. (3) If a permittee carries out compensatory wetland mitigation under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) in cooperation with public agencies, private organizations, or other parties, the permittee remains responsible for the compensatory wetland mitigation to the extent otherwise provided by law. (4) The Subject to section 30311e(3), the department may require financial assurance to ensure that compensatory wetland mitigation is accomplished as specified. To ensure that wetland benefits are replaced by compensatory wetland mitigation, the department may release financial assurance only after the permit applicant or mitigation bank sponsor has completed monitoring of the mitigation site and demonstrated compliance with performance standards in accordance with a schedule in the permit or mitigation banking agreement. (5) If compensatory wetland mitigation is required, in setting the mitigation ratio the department shall consider the method of compensatory mitigation, the likelihood of success, differences between the functions lost at the impacted site and the functions expected to be produced by the compensatory mitigation project, temporary losses of aquatic resource functions, the difficulty of restoring or establishing the desired aquatic resource type and functions, and the distance between the affected aquatic resource and the mitigation site. (6) For agricultural activities, a permit applicant may provide for protection and restoration of the impacted site under a conservation easement with the department as part of mitigation requirements. A permit applicant may make a payment into the stewardship fund, if established under subsection (7), as part of mitigation requirements, as an alternative to providing financial assurances required under subsection (4). (7) The department may establish a stewardship fund in the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund . The state treasurer shall and credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. The department shall be is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the fund, upon on appropriation, only to develop mitigation for impacted sites or as an alternative to financial assurance required under subsection (4). (8) By 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, the department shall submit to the office of regulatory reform for informal review revised administrative The department shall promulgate rules on in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, regarding mitigation that do all of the following: (a) Reduce the preference for on-site mitigation. (b) Allow flexibility in mitigation ratios for uses of wetlands. (c) Allow a reduction of mitigation ratios when approved credits from a wetland mitigation bank are used. (d) Allow consideration of additional ecologically beneficial features. (e) Allow any excess mitigation for any project to be credited to another project at a later date. (9) The department shall submit revised administrative rules that encourage the development of wetland mitigation banks to the office of regulatory reform for informal review within 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection. The rules shall do all of the following: (f) (a) Enlarge mitigation bank service areas. However, a A mitigation bank service area shall must be located within the same watershed or ecoregion as the permitted project or activity, ensure no net loss of the wetland resources, and protect the predominant wetland functions of the service area. The department shall consider enlarging the size of ecoregions for mitigation bank service areas. (g) (b) Allow earlier release of credits if the benefits of a mitigation bank have been properly established and the credits are revocable or covered by a financial assurance. (h) Allow developers to buy temporary mitigation credits to offset time delays while permittee-responsible mitigation is completed. Credits can be retired or reassigned once the site is built and certified. As used in this subdivision, "temporary mitigation credits" means credits generated by an approved wetland mitigation bank or other department-approved source that may be used to offset wetland impacts for a limited period of time. (i) (c) Allow wetland preservation to be used in areas where wetland restoration opportunities do not exist, if an unacceptable disruption of the aquatic resources will not result. (9) (10) The department shall establish a wetland mitigation bank funding program under part 52 that provides grants and loans to eligible municipalities for the purposes of establishing mitigation banks. (10) In addition to the requirements under this section, compensatory wetland mitigation must comply with section 30311e. Sec. 30311e. (1) Subject to subsection (2), mitigation activities must be completed concurrently with other permitted activities, unless the department and the permittee agree to an alternative schedule. (2) Mitigation activities may occur on a time-adjusted schedule for seasonal hydrology or construction conditions or in stages based on the development phasing plans of other permitted activities. If a permittee opts to complete mitigation activities on a time-adjusted schedule, the permittee shall provide the department with a justification of the need for the time-adjusted schedule and a start date for the mitigation activities. If a permittee opts to complete mitigation activities in stages, the permittee shall include in the development phasing plan performance deadlines and reporting requirements for each stage of mitigation activity. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department may require financial assurance to ensure that mitigation activities are accomplished as specified. Financial assurance is required for high-risk mitigation activities and delayed mitigation activities, as described in subsection (4). Financial assurance is not required for the following mitigation activities: (a) On a site that is 0.25 acres or less in size. (b) That occur on the same site as the permitted activities. (4) If the department and the permittee agree to an alternative schedule under subsection (1) that delays mitigation activities, the department shall require the permittee to provide financial assurance in the form of a bond in an amount equal to the estimated cost of completing the remaining mitigation activities, including monitoring and corrective actions, as determined by the department and based on a third-party cost estimate. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Development phasing plans" means a written, site-specific plan submitted as part of a permit application that includes the following information: (i) The identity of the discrete stages of construction or land development over time, including the sequencing of site disturbance, infrastructure installation, and associated mitigation activities. (ii) A demonstration of how wetland mitigation will be implemented, monitored, and completed in coordination with each development phase. (b) "High-risk mitigation activities" means a type of mitigation activity that has an elevated likelihood of failure to achieve required wetland performance standards due to factors including, but not limited to, complex hydrology manipulation, reliance on engineered water control structures, use of novel or experimental design approaches, limited site accessibility for long-term management, or implementation in areas with uncertain soil, groundwater, or watershed conditions. (c) "Mitigation activities" means activities performed to avoid, minimize, rectify, reduce, or compensate for impacts to wetlands, including, but not limited to, wetland restoration, creation, enhancement, preservation, relocation, internal reconfiguration within a development parcel, monitoring, maintenance, and adaptive management, as required by a permit or authorization issued under this part.